Washington statutes.
RCW 39.32.060

Rules and regulations.

The director of enterprise services shall have power to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of RCW 39.32.010 through 39.32.060 and to carry out the provisions of the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended.

[ 2015 c 225 s 44; 1977 ex.s. c 135 s 5; 1967 ex.s. c 70 s 6; 1945 c 205 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-66.]

NOTES: